Washington statutes.
RCW 43.380.040

Council—Initial appointments—Terms—Selection committee—Cochairs.

(1) The governor shall make initial appointments to the council. Initial appointments are for staggered terms from the date of appointment according to the following: Four members have four-year terms; four members have three-year terms; and five members have two-year terms. The governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the staggered terms.

(2) Except for initial appointments under subsection (1) of this section, all appointments are for two years from the date of appointment. Any member may be reappointed for additional terms. Any member of the council may be removed by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty after notice and a public hearing, unless such notice and hearing is expressly waived in writing by the affected member. In the event of a vacancy due to death, resignation, or removal, or upon the expiration of a term, the governor shall appoint a successor for the remainder of the unexpired term according to the procedures in subsection (3) of this section. Vacancies must be filled within ninety days.

(3) The council shall create a selection committee to recruit, review, and recommend future members. Prior to thirty days before the expiration of a term or within sixty days of a vacancy due to death, resignation, or removal, the selection committee shall submit a recommendation of possible appointees. The governor shall consider the recommendations of the committee when making appointments.

(4) The council shall elect cochairs from among its membership. Cochairs are elected for two-year terms from the date of election. Any former or current cochair may be reelected for an additional term.

[ 2016 c 188 s 5.]